New York, session 2025-2026, A4504.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 of section 209 of the social 2 services law, as amended by section 2 of part R of chapter 56 of the 3 laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (e) On and after January first, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-six, 5 (i) for an eligible individual receiving enhanced residential care, 6 [$1,661.00] $1,856.00; and (ii) for an eligible couple receiving 7 enhanced residential care, two times the amount set forth in subpara- 8 graph (i) of this paragraph. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 11 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 12 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 13 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00864-07-6